Georgia, session 2025_26, HB505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
9 SECTION 1.
10 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Career Readiness and Economic
11 Development Act."
12 SECTION 2.
13 Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended in Part
14 16 of Article 6 of Chapter 2, the "Building Resourceful Individuals to Develop Georgia's
15 Economy Act," by revising Code Section 20-2-326, relating to definitions, as follows:
H. B. 505
- 1 -

25 LC 61 0099
16 "20-2-326.
17 For purposes of As used in this part, the term:
18 (1) 'Articulation' means agreement between a high school and a postsecondary institution
19 regarding the awarding of both secondary and postsecondary credit for a dual enrollment
20 course.
21 (2) 'Career development plan' means a student specific plan provided for in
22 subsection (c) of Code Section 20-2-327.
23 (2)(3) 'Choice technical high school' means a high school, other than the high school to
24 which a student is assigned by virtue of his or her residence and attendance zone, which
25 is designed to prepare a high school student for postsecondary education and for
26 employment in a career field. A choice technical high school may be operated by a local
27 school system or a technical school or college. A choice technical high school may also
28 be operated as a charter school under a governance board composed of parents,
29 employers, and representatives from the local board of education.
30 (3)(4) 'Chronically low-performing high school' means a public high school in this state
31 that has a graduation rate of less than 60 percent for three consecutive years, as
32 determined in accordance with methodology established by the National Governors
33 Association's Compact on High School Graduation Data, or that has received an
34 unacceptable rating for three consecutive years, as defined by the Office of Student
35 Achievement.
36 (4)(5) 'College and career academy' means a specialized school established as a charter
37 school or pursuant to a contract for a strategic waivers school system or charter system,
38 which formalizes a partnership that demonstrates a collaboration between business,
39 industry, and community stakeholders to advance work force development between one
40 or more local boards of education, a private individual, a private organization, or a state
41 or local public entity in cooperation with one or more postsecondary institutions.
H. B. 505
- 2 -

25 LC 61 0099
42 (5)(6) 'Focused program of study' means a rigorous academic core combined with a
43 focus in mathematics and science; a focus in humanities, fine arts, and foreign language;
44 or a coherent sequence of career pathway courses that is aligned with graduation
45 requirements established by the State Board of Education and content standards
46 established pursuant to Part 2 of this article that prepares a student for postsecondary
47 education or immediate employment after high school graduation.
48 (6) 'Graduation plan' means a student specific plan developed in accordance with
49 subsection (c) of Code Section 20-2-327 detailing the courses necessary for a high school
50 student to graduate from high school and to successfully transition to postsecondary
51 education and the work force.
52 (7) 'Industry certification' means a process of program evaluation that ensures that
53 individual programs meet state, national, or international industry standards in the areas
54 of curriculum, teacher qualification, lab specifications, equipment, and industry
55 involvement.
56 (7.1)(8) 'Industry credentialing' means a process through which students are assessed by
57 an independent third-party certifying entity using predetermined standards for knowledge,
58 skills, and competencies, resulting in the award of individual certification or state
59 licensure or an occupational competency that is state, nationally, or internationally
60 recognized.
61 (8)(9) 'Public college or university' means a two-year or four-year college, university, or
62 other institution under the auspices of the Board of Regents of the University System of
63 Georgia.
64 (9)(10) 'Small learning community' means an autonomous or semiautonomous small
65 learning environment within a large high school which is made up of a subset of students
66 and teachers for a two-year, three-year, or four-year period. The goal of a small learning
67 community is to achieve greater personalization of learning with each community led by
68 a principal or instructional leader. A small learning community blends academic studies
H. B. 505
- 3 -

25 LC 61 0099
69 around a broad career or academic theme where teachers have common planning time to
70 connect teacher assignments and assessments to college and career readiness standards.
71 Students voluntarily apply for enrollment in a small learning community but must be
72 accepted, and such enrollment must be approved by the student's parent or guardian. A
73 small learning community also includes a college and career academy organized around
74 a specific career theme which integrates academic and career instruction, provides work
75 based learning opportunities, and prepares students for postsecondary education and
76 employment, with support through partnerships with local employers, community
77 organizations, and postsecondary institutions.
78 (10)(11) 'Teacher adviser system' means a system where an individual professional
79 educator in the school assists a small group of students and their parents or guardians
80 throughout the students' high school careers to set postsecondary goals and help them
81 prepare programs of study, utilizing assessments and other data to track academic
82 progress on a regular basis; communicates frequently with parents or guardians; and
83 provides advisement, support, and encouragement as needed.
84 (11)(12) 'Technical school or college' means a college, institution, or other branch of the
85 Technical College System of Georgia."
86 SECTION 3.
87 Said title is further amended in said part by revising Code Section 20-2-327, relating to
88 recognition of advanced proficiency and honors courses and counseling and development of
89 individual graduation plans, as follows:
90 "20-2-237.
91 (a) Student performance at the advanced proficiency/honors proficiency or honors level
92 on any assessments required for purposes of high school graduation shall be recognized as:
93 (1) Meeting postsecondary entrance test requirements; and
H. B. 505
- 4 -

25 LC 61 0099
94 (2) Qualifying students to enroll in credit-bearing postsecondary coursework in
95 accordance with policies and requirements established by the State Board of Education,
96 the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, and the State Board of the
97 Technical College System of Georgia.
98 (b) Secondary and postsecondary credit shall be awarded immediately upon successful
99 completion of any articulated or dual enrollment course in accordance with policies and
100 requirements established by the State Board of Education, the Board of Regents of the
101 University System of Georgia, and the State Board of the Technical College System of
102 Georgia.
103 (c)(1) Students in the sixth, seventh, and eighth grades shall be provided counseling,
104 advisement, career awareness, career interest and career demand inventories, and
105 information to assist them in evaluating their academic skills, career oriented aptitudes,
106 and career interests. Before the end of the second semester of the eighth grade, or within
107 90 days of enrollment in the case of a high school student who does not already have a
108 career development plan, students shall develop an individual graduation a career
109 development plan based on their academic skills, career oriented aptitudes, and career
110 interests in consultation with their parents, guardians, or individuals appointed by the
111 parents or guardians to serve as their designee. A student's individual graduation career
112 development plan shall be taken into consideration when scheduling a student's courses
113 in ninth grade high school. High school students shall be provided guidance, advisement,
114 and counseling annually that will enable them to successfully update and implement their
115 individual graduation career development plans, preparing them for a seamless transition
116 to postsecondary study, further training, or employment, including information regarding
117 occupations, degrees, industry credentials, certifications, and technical skills; work-ready
118 skills in demand by Georgia employers through the department's career pipeline public
119 website; and other career related inventories made available through the Technical
120 College System of Georgia or the Office of Student Achievement. Beginning with the
H. B. 505
- 5 -

25 LC 61 0099
121 2018-2019 school year in tenth grade, such guidance, advisement, and counseling for
122 high school students shall include providing career oriented aptitude and career interest
123 guidance along with concrete strategies and steps for achieving students' postsecondary
124 goals. An individual graduation A career development plan shall:
125 (A) Include rigorous academic core subjects and focused coursework in mathematics
126 and science or in humanities, fine arts, and foreign language or sequenced career
127 pathway coursework;
128 (B) Incorporate provisions of a student's Individualized Education Program (IEP),
129 where applicable;
130 (C) Align educational and broad career goals, and a student's course of study, and
131 extracurricular activities;
132 (D) Be based on the student's selected academic and career focus area as approved by
133 the student's parent or guardian;
134 (E) Include experience based, career oriented learning experiences which may include,
135 but not be limited to, participation in work based learning programs such as internships,
136 apprenticeships, cooperative education, and employability skill development;
137 (F) Include any applicable industry credentialing that pertains to the student's focused
138 program of study;
139 (G) Include opportunities for postsecondary studies through articulation, dual
140 enrollment, and joint enrollment;
141 (H) Be flexible to allow change in the course of study but be sufficiently structured to
142 meet graduation requirements and qualify the student for admission to postsecondary
143 education; and
144 (I) Be approved by the student and the student's parent or guardian with guidance from
145 the student's school counselor or teacher adviser;
146 (J) Include a portfolio which shall include the student's resume, skills, awards,
147 activities, and other relevant information; and
H. B. 505
- 6 -

25 LC 61 0099
148 (K) Be accessible to designated school personnel, students, and parents on the
149 electronic platform developed pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section.
150 (2) An individual graduation A career development plan shall be reviewed annually, and
151 revised, if appropriate, upon approval by the student and the student's parent or guardian
152 with guidance from the student's school counselor or teacher adviser. An individual
153 graduation A career development plan may be changed at any time throughout a student's
154 high school career upon approval by the student and the student's parent or guardian with
155 guidance from the student's school counselor or teacher adviser.
156 (d) The Department of Education shall develop an electronic platform which shall be
157 available for use by school personnel, students, and parents to support the creation and
158 revision of career development plans. The Department of Education shall be authorized to
159 contract for the development and operation of such electronic platform. Such electronic
160 platform shall:
161 (1) Be accessible to designated school personnel, students, and parents;
162 (2) Provide access to data included in the report required by subsection (b) of Code
163 Section 20-2-327.1;
164 (3) Provide information regarding occupations, degrees, industry credentialing,
165 certifications, and technical skills;
166 (4) Provide information on work-ready skills in demand by Georgia employers; and
167 (5) Ensure that students do not lose access to their career development plan or student
168 portfolio after graduation.
169 (e) The Department of Education shall utilize de-identified data collected through the
170 electronic platform developed pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section to evaluate
171 the effectiveness of career development plans."
H. B. 505
- 7 -

25 LC 61 0099
172 SECTION 4.
173 Said title is further amended in Code Section 20-2-329, relating to requirements for high
174 schools that receive reform grants as chronically low-performing high schools, by revising
175 paragraphs (3) and (7) as follows:
176 "(3) Provide students in the ninth through twelfth grades information on educational
177 programs offered in high school, in technical and community colleges, in colleges and
178 universities, and through work based learning programs and how these programs can lead
179 to a variety of career fields. Local school systems shall provide career awareness and
180 exploratory opportunities such as field trips, speakers, educational and career information
181 centers, job shadowing, and classroom centers to assist students and their parents or
182 guardians, with guidance from school counselors and teacher advisers, in revising, if
183 appropriate, the individual graduation career development plan developed pursuant to
184 subsection (c) of Code Section 20-2-327;"
185 "(7) Schedule annual conferences to assist students and their parents or guardians in
186 setting educational and career goals and creating individual graduation career
187 development plans beginning with students in the eighth grade and continuing through
188 high school. These conferences shall include, but are not limited to, assisting the student
189 in identifying educational and career interests and goals, selecting a career and academic
190 focus area, and developing an individual graduation a career development plan."
191 SECTION 5.
192 Said title is further amended by replacing "individual graduation plan" and "individual
193 graduation plans" with "career development plan" and "career development plans",
194 respectively, wherever such phrases appear in:
195 (1) Code Section 20-2-161.3, relating to the "Dual Enrollment Act," purpose, dual credit
196 courses, eligibility for participation, eligibility for secondary course credits, eligibility to
H. B. 505
- 8 -

25 LC 61 0099
197 meet high school graduation requirements, eligibility for award of high school diploma,
198 funding, limitations on total hours, exceptions, and eligibility for payment;
199 (2) Code Section 20-2-327.1, relating to industry credentialing for career, technical, and
200 agricultural education programs and reporting;
201 (3) Code Section 20-2-328, relating to competitive grant program; and
202 (4) Code Section 20-2-2065, relating to waiver of provisions of this title, requirements for
203 operating, and control and management.
204 SECTION 6.
205 Said title is further amended in Code Section 20-3-242, relating to web based counseling and
206 resources for students provided by the Georgia Student Finance Commission, by replacing
207 "graduation plan" with "career development plan".
208 SECTION 7.
209 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 505
- 9 -